Illinois, session 104th, HB3088.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Children and Family Services Act is amended 5by adding Section 5.36 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 505/5.36 new)7    Sec. 5.36. Extended residential developmental disability 8services. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 9contrary, the Department of Children and Family Services and 10the Department of Human Services shall adopt rules that permit 11a licensed child care institution or group home that provides 12residential developmental disability services to youth under 13the age of 22 to request an age waiver to allow such youth to 14continue to receive residential developmental disability 15services and supports at the facility beyond their 22nd 16birthday. The rules shall include waiver application 17requirements, waiver renewals, and criteria a youth must meet 18to qualify for extended residential developmental disability 19services. A licensed child care institution or group home that 20receives Department approval of its waiver application shall 21not be issued any notice of violation or citation for 22providing extended residential developmental disability 23services to a youth within the terms of the approved waiver   HB3088- 2 -LRB104 12154 KTG 22254 b1application. The Department of Children and Family Services 2and the Department of Human Services' Division of 3Developmental Disabilities shall ensure that the rates 4determined for extended residential developmental disability 5services authorized under an approved age waiver are on parity 6with the rates determined for residential developmental 7disability services provided to youth under the age of 22. 8Nothing in this Section shall be construed to reduce the level 9or type of services and supports provided to a youth beyond 10their 22nd birthday under an approved age waiver application.